Tennessee, session 114, HB0065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-19-101(a), is amended by
redesignating subdivision (33) as new subdivision (34) and by adding the following as new
subdivision (33):
(33) Contract with a private entity for the development, construction,
management, or operation of an indoor or outdoor sports facility under terms acceptable
to the city, including, but not limited to, terms for the division between the city and a
private entity of operating revenues or losses, for the lease or sale of all or part of the
facility, for the payment of management fees, or for such other terms the city determines
to be in the best interests of the city and its residents; and
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0065
001130
- 1 -